tables/id-id-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Indonesian Braille Code (Grade 2)
#
#-display-name: Indonesian braille (Grade 2)
#-index-name: Indonesian
#
#+language:id
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
#+dots:6
#+direction:forward
#
# Based on Tunanetra KK C_Yekti 16April2016.pdf
# Created by Antigravity
#

# ==========================================
# PUNCTUATION (Tanda Baca)
# Table 3.4
# ==========================================

# punctuation . 256
always . 256
punctuation , 2
punctuation ; 23
punctuation : 25
punctuation ? 236
punctuation ! 235
# Quote open and close might be context dependent, but mapping as per simple definition first
punctuation " 236 # kutip (same as ?) - context usually distinguishes, ? at end, " at start
punctuation “ 236 # kutip buka
punctuation ” 356 # kutip tutup
punctuation ( 2356
punctuation ) 2356
hyphen - 36
punctuation / 34
punctuation ' 3 # apostrof
punctuation ± 26-35 # lebih kurang
punctuation * 35-35 # bintang
always … 3-3-3 # Ellipsis

include spaces.uti
include latinLetterDef6Dots.uti



# Formatting
capsletter 6 # Capital sign (Tanda Kapital)
begcapsword 6-6 # Double Capital (All caps word)
# Italic/Kursif
# noback italic \x001B 46
# Number sign
numsign 3456

# ==========================================
# NUMBERS (Angka)
# Table 3.5 & 3.6
# ==========================================
# Standard numbers are handled by en-ueb-g1.ctb (litdigits 1245...)
# But we ensure number sign acts correctly.
include digits6Dots.uti

# Tanda Pugar (Letter sign) ; 56
# Used to indicate letter when following number (e.g. 5E)
letsign 56

# ==========================================
# SINGLE WORD CONTRACTIONS (Tanda Kata Tunggal)
# Table 4.3 (Huruf Abjad)
# ==========================================

word anda 1
word bagi 12
word cara 14
word dari 145
word emas 15
word faktor 124
word lagi 1245
word harus 125
word itu 24
word jadi 245
word kita 13
word lalu 123
word mereka 134
word ini 1345
word oleh 135
word pada 1234
word kualitas 12345
word karena 1235
word saya 234
word tak 2345
word untuk 136
word vitamin 1236
word waktu 2456
word aksi 1346
word yang 13456
word zat 1356

# ==========================================
# INVERSE LETTER WORDS (Huruf Balik)
# Table 4.4
# ==========================================

# M terbalik (1-4-6)
word kamu 146
# N terbalik (1-2-4-6)
word bukan 1246
# O terbalik (2-4-6)
word atau 246
# P terbalik (1-4-5-6)
word ke 1456
# Q terbalik (1-2-4-5-6)
word jangan 12456
# S terbalik (1-5-6)
word satu 156
# T terbalik (1-2-5-6)
word telah 1256
# U terbalik (3-4-6)
word buat 346
# V terbalik (3-4-5-6)
word sebagai 3456
# Y terbalik (1-2-3-4-6)
word serta 12346
# Z terbalik (2-3-4-6)
word nyata 2346

# ==========================================
# LOWER CELL WORDS (Tanda Bawah)
# Table 4.5
# ==========================================

word bahwa 23
word dengan 256
word memang 26
word maka 235
word agar 2356
word masih 236
word ia 35
word supaya 356

# ==========================================
# OTHER WORDS (Tanda Lain)
# Table 4.6
# ==========================================

word sampai 16
word di 34
word dan 345
word aku 23456
word akan 12356
word hingga 123456

# ==========================================
# PREFIX WORDS (Tanda Kata dengan Awalan)
# ==========================================

# ------------------------------------------
# Dot 5 Sequence Words (Table 4.7 & 4.8)
# ------------------------------------------

word baik 5-12
word capai 5-14
word dalam 5-145
word erat 5-15
word fakta 5-124
word ganti 5-1245
word hari 5-125
word ikat 5-24
word jalan 5-245
word kali 5-13
word lain 5-123
word mana 5-134
word naik 5-1345
word orang 5-135
word pakai 5-1234
word kuantitas 5-12345
word rakyat 5-1235
word sangat 5-234
word tahu 5-2345
word ubah 5-136
word variasi 5-1236
word walau 5-2456
word laksana 5-1346
word yakin 5-13456
word zakat 5-1356

# Dot 5 + Inverse/Other (Table 4.8)
word diri 5-34
word muka 5-146
word suara 5-346
word sama 5-156
word antara 5-345
word terang 5-1256
word kerja 5-1456
word nyanyi 5-1246
word sebab 5-12346
word kuasa 5-23456
word tinggal 5-12456

# ------------------------------------------
# Dot 4-5 Sequence Words (Table 4.9 & 4.10)
# ------------------------------------------

word atur 45-1
word buka 45-12
word cukup 45-14
word duduk 45-145
word engkau 45-15
word fungsi 45-124
word guna 45-1245
word hubung 45-125
word ikut 45-24
word juru 45-245
word kurang 45-13
word luar 45-123
word mungkin 45-134
word nurani 45-1345
word punya 45-1234
word khusus 45-12345
word rupa 45-1235
word sudah 45-234
word tuju 45-2345
word umum 45-136
word volume 45-1236
word wujud 45-2456
word maksud 45-1346

# Dot 4-5 + Inverse/Other (Table 4.10)
word kemudian 45-1456
word tunanetra 45-156
word terus 45-1256
word seluruh 45-12346
word ganggu 45-123456
word anjur 45-345
word suatu 45-346
word kuitansi 45-23456

# ------------------------------------------
# Dot 4 Sequence Words (Table 4.11)
# ------------------------------------------

word atas 4-1
word aneh 4-15
word arti 4-24
word abnormal 4-135
word arus 4-136

# ------------------------------------------
# Dot 3-4-5-6 (#) Sequence Words (Table 4.12)
# ------------------------------------------

word sekali 3456-13
word selalu 3456-123
word sebelum 3456-134
word senang 3456-1345
word seperti 3456-1234
word sekarang 3456-1235
word sesuai 3456-234
word sedang 3456-12456
word sedangkan 3456-12356
word sendiri 3456-34
word semua 3456-346
word setelah 3456-1256
word selesai 3456-16
word sehingga 3456-123456
word sekunder 3456-23456

# ==========================================
# SIBRA (Singkatan Braille)
# Selected list from PDF
# ==========================================

word akhir 1-13-125
word bagaimana 12-1245-134
word bagus 12-1245-234
word bahasa 12-125-234
word balik 12-123-13
word bangun 12-12456-1345
word baris 12-1235-234
word baru 12-1235
# belum (blm) - check conflict with b = bagi? no, b is single word.
word belum 12-123-134
word bila 12-123
word bilang 12-123-12456
word bodoh 12-145-125
word bohong 12-125-12456
word braille 12-1235-123
word bulat 12-123-2345
word buta 12-2345
word butir 12-2345-1235
word butuh 12-2345-125
word calon 14-123-1345
word cepat 14-1234-2345 

# ==========================================
# BAGIAN KATA (Part-Word Contractions)
# ==========================================

# ------------------------------------------
# Bebas (Anywhere) - Table 4.13 & Text
# ------------------------------------------

always ua 346
always kan 12356
always kam 12356
always mu 146
always au 246
always ke 1456
always st 156
always te 1256
always se 12346
always nya 2346
always me 26
always ia 35
always ai 16
always an 345
always am 345
always di 34
always ng 12456
always ny 1246
always ku 23456

# ------------------------------------------
# Terbatas (Restricted Position) 
# ------------------------------------------

# Depan & Tengah (Beg/Mid)
begmidword be 23
begmidword pe 25
begmidword ter 356
begmidword ber 235
begmidword per 256

# Tengah Saja (Mid)
midword aa 2
# midword in 2356
always ini 456-1345
midword im 2356
midword un 236
midword um 236
midword ngg 123456

# Belakang Saja (Suffix)
sufword kah 46
sufword lah 456
sufword pun 45

# ------------------------------------------
# Tanda Ulang (Repeat)
# ------------------------------------------
# "-" (hyphen) in input becomes 1-2-6 in braille for repeated words?
# Or just standard repeat symbol.
# Liblouis "repword" replaces the separator.
# Example: kupu-kupu -> kupu<
repword - 126
